Massachusetts, session 194th, H152.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) There shall be a special commission to study cannabis consumption that would
constitute public intoxication or operating under the influence in a manner equivalent to the
standards adopted for the consumption of alcoholic beverages. The commission shall consist of
the following members: the chair of the cannabis control commission or their designee acting as
chairperson; the commissioner of the department of public health or their designee; the secretary
of the executive office of public safety and security or their designee; the commissioner of the
department of mental health or their designee; the chair of the Massachusetts peace officers
standards and training commission or their designee; the colonel of the Massachusetts State
Police or their designee; 1 member appointed by the governor; 1 member appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives; 1 member appointed by the senate president; 1 member
appointed by the Massachusetts Association of District Attorneys; 1 member appointed by the
Massachusetts Bar Association; 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts Medical Association;
1 member appointed by the Massachusetts Pediatricians Association; 1 member appointed by the
of 3

dean of the Harvard School of Public Health; 1 member appointed by the dean of the University
of Massachusetts Medical School; and a representative the Cannabis growers of Massachusetts.
The commission to meet according to the schedule of the chair.
(b) The commission shall study the growth of the usage of cannabis since the legalization
of consumption, including, but not limited to, (i) the strength of current products and frequency
of use by the public; (ii) the multiple forms of consumption available to the public of both legal
and illegally purchased products; (iii) whether cannabis is being treated with synthetic or other
substances not historically used in the cultivation of the marijuana plant; (iv) and the effects
these substances are having on the citizens of the commonwealth and their health and safety.
(c) The commission shall make a recommendation of the level of intoxication to be
legally allowed in the commonwealth, a system of measurement of that level and the level for the
operation under the influence for motor vehicles ,including, but not limited to, vehicles operated
by a fuel powered motor whether used on the public roadways or private ways, for construction
purposes, industrial purposes, farm purposes, business or recreational purposes, operated on land,
water or in the air; operated by remote control or operated by presence inside the vehicle. The
commission shall devise a method for the determination of the level necessary to create an
unsafe level of consumption for the operation under the influence. The commission shall also
study the level of consumption necessary to create an unsafe workplace.If there is not a current
system for measurement the Commission shall make a recommendation concerning whether this
is a field of industry to be encouraged in the commonwealth and recommend incentives for
business development in the commonwealth if appropriate. If the Commission is unable to find a
method for measuring intoxication, the Commission shall make specific recommendations for a
field sobriety test to be enacted by the legislature.
of 3

(d) The commission shall be formed within 90 days of the passage of this act or not later
than January 1, 2026 and shall file a report of its findings, including any legislative or regulatory
recommendations, with the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives , the speaker of
the house of representatives, the president of the senate, the joint committee on public safety and
homeland security, the joint committee on cannabis policy, the joint committee on public health
and the joint committee on mental health and substance use not later than December 31, 2026.
of 3